Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The twelfth day of June of each year is designated as "Women Veterans
Appreciation Day" in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(2) The Governor shall issue a proclamation each year designating June 12 as
"Women Veterans Appreciation Day" in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and
encourage the citizens of this Commonwealth to acknowledge the day in
commemoration of the numerous contributions, sacrifices, and displays of valor
made by women veterans.
Section 2. Whereas it is of the utmost importance to recognize women who
have valiantly served in the military and to commemorate Women Veterans Appreciation
Day in 2026, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage
and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/9/2026 9:31 AM Jacketed